Washington statutes.
RCW 35.71.020

Establishment declared public purpose—Authority to establish—General powers.

The establishment of pedestrian malls is declared to be for a public purpose. Any corporate authority, by ordinance, may establish and regulate any street right-of-way as a mall, may prohibit, in whole or in part, vehicular traffic on a mall, and may provide for the acquisition of any interest in the right-of-way necessary to its establishment, and may provide for the determination of legal damages, if any, to abutting property.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.71.020. Prior: 1961 c 111 s 2.]